Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 2. Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act (REPLICA)
and Severability

This Compact
shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof.
If this Compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any
state member thereto, the Compact shall remain in full force and effect
as to the remaining member states. Nothing in this Compact supersedes
state law or rules related to licensure of EMS [agencies.]

Editor's Notes.—

The bracketed
word “[agencies.]” in Section 15 was added at the direction
of the Wyoming legislative service office.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 38, §
3, makes
the act effective July 1, 2017.